Louisiana, session 2026, HB69.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:334(A) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§334. Ignition interlock device offenses
A. No A person who, as a condition of probation or any other provision of
law, is prohibited from operating a motor vehicle unless it is equipped with an
ignition interlock device as provided in R.S. 15:306, Code of Criminal Procedure
Article 320(C), or any other provision of law, shall not:
(1) Operate, lease, or borrow a motor vehicle unless that vehicle is equipped
with a functioning ignition interlock device.
(2) Request or solicit any other person to blow into an ignition interlock
device or to start a motor vehicle equipped with the device for the purpose of
providing the person so restricted with an operable motor vehicle.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.